en: Pâté in crust
fr: Pâté en croûte

en: Swiss sausages
fr: Saucisses suisses

en: Swiss sausages to cook
fr: Saucisse suisse à cuire

en: Mortadella
bg: Мортадела
de: Mortadella
es: Mortadela
fi: mortadella
fr: Mortadelle
hr: Mortadela
it: Mortadella
ja: モルタデッラ
nl: Mortadella
pl: Mortadela

en: Poultry mortadella
de: Geflügel-Mortadella
fr: Mortadelle de volaille

en: Mortadella pure pork
fr: Mortadelle pur porc
hr: Mortadela čista svinjska
it: Mortadella puro suino

en: Pork and beef mortadella
fr: Mortadelle porc et boeuf

en: Mortadella with pistachios pure pork
fr: Mortadelle pistachée pur porc

it: Mortadella Bologna
fr: Mortadelle de Bologne

en: Lyoner
xx: Lyoner
de: Lyoner

en: Pork lyoner
de: Schweine Lyoner

en: Poultry lyoner
de: Geflügel Lyoner

fr: Charcuteries diverses
hr: Različiti mesni delikatesi

en: Galantine
fr: Galantine
hr: Pihtije
ja: ガランティーヌ

en: Lardons, pork lardons, lardoons, lardings
de: Speckwürfel
fi: laardi
fr: Lardons de porc, Lardons
hr: Lardoni
it: Pancetta
ja: ラードン
nl: Spekjes

en: Plain lardons, plain lardoons
fr: Lardons de porc natures, Lardons nature

en: Smoked lardons, smoked lardoons
de: Räucherspeck
es: Lardones ahumados
fr: Lardons de porc fumés, Lardons fumés
hr: Dimljene masti
nl: Gerookte spekjes

en: Guanciale
it: Guanciale

en: Poultry lardons
fr: Lardons de volaille
hr: Lardoni od peradi
nl: Gevogeltespekjes

en: Diced ham, Dices of ham, Ham in cube, Grated ham, minced ham, diced ham
bg: Шунка на кубчета
fi: kinkkukuutiot
fr: Dés de jambon, dés de jambons, râpé de jambon, haché de jambon, Allumettes de jambon
hr: Kockice šunke
nl: Hamblokjes